Oklahoma, session 2025, SB812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 43A O.S. 2021, Section 1-110, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 134, O.S.L. 2024 (43A O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 1-110), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1-110. A. As an alternative to transport under


subsection B of this section for the sole purpose of initial


assessment of a person who the officer reasonably believes is a


person requiring treatment, as defined in Section 1-103 of this


title, sheriffs and peace officers may request an assessment at the


point of initial contact by the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services. To conduct the assessment, the Department


may utilize:

Req. No. 1098 Page 1


1. Telemedicine, when such capability is available through a


mobile computing device in the possession of the local law


enforcement agency, to have the person assessed by a licensed mental


health professional employed by or under contract with a facility


operated by, certified by, or contracted with the Department; or


2. An in-person assessment by a licensed mental health


professional on a mobile crisis response team or who is employed by


or under contract with a facility operated by, certified by, or


contracted with the Department.


B. 1. To serve the mental health needs of persons of their


jurisdiction, peace officers shall be responsible for transporting


individuals in need of:


a. initial assessment, except when the individual has


been assessed at the point of initial contact by the


Department under subsection A of this section, or


b. emergency detention or protective custody under


Section 5-207 of this title, unless the officer has


already transported the individual to the facility for


initial assessment,


from the point of initial contact to the nearest facility, as


defined in Section 1-103 of this title, that is appropriate for


initial assessment or treatment of the individual within a thirty-


mile radius of the peace officer’s operational headquarters.



Req. No. 1098 Page 2


2. Transportation to the nearest appropriate facility shall be


completed by either the Department of Mental Health and Substance


Abuse Services or an entity contracted by the Department for


alternative transportation if:


a. there is not an appropriate facility within a thirty-


mile radius of the peace officer’s operational


headquarters, or


b. the officer has already transported the individual to


an appropriate facility for initial assessment.


3. For purposes of this section, “initial contact” is defined


as contact with an individual in need of assessment, emergency


detention, or protective custody made by a law enforcement officer.


Initial contact in this section does not include an individual self-


presenting at a facility as defined in Section 1-103 of this title.


4. When an individual self-presents at a facility as defined in


Section 1-103 of this title or at a medical facility and is placed


into protective custody under Section 5-207 of this title due to a


determination that the individual is a person requiring treatment as


defined in Section 1-103 of this title, and if transport to another


facility is needed for initial assessment or treatment, the person


shall be transported to the nearest appropriate facility by the


Department or an entity contracted by the Department for alternative


transportation.



Req. No. 1098 Page 3


5. When an individual self-presents at a facility as defined in


Section 1-103 of this title or at a medical facility and is not


placed into protective custody under Section 5-207 of this title,


but consents to voluntary transport to a facility as defined in


Section 1-103 of this title for treatment, transport or the


arrangement of transport shall be the responsibility of the facility


receiving the individual, unless the individual chooses to arrange


his or her own transportation.


6. The Except for unaccompanied minors, the transportation


requirements provided by this subsection, to the extent such


requirements are applicable to peace officers, shall be considered


fulfilled once the person has been transported to the facility, the


officer has made contact with the appropriate staff of the facility,


and the staff of the facility have determined that the patient does


not present a clear or immediate threat to his or her own safety or


to the safety of the staff of the facility. Once custody of the


individual has been transferred to the appropriate facility staff,


the peace officer shall not be required to remain at the facility


with the individual pending initial assessment or treatment. For


the purposes of this section, “unaccompanied minor” means any person


under eighteen (18) years of age who is transported to a facility


pursuant to this section without his or her parent or legal


guardian.



Req. No. 1098 Page 4


C. A municipal law enforcement agency shall be responsible for


transportation as provided in this section for any individual found


within such municipality’s jurisdiction. The county sheriff shall


be responsible for transportation as provided in this section for


any individual found outside of a municipality’s jurisdiction, but


within the county.


D. Once an individual has been presented to an appropriate


facility as provided in subsection B of this section, the Department


of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services or an entity


contracted by the Department shall be responsible for any subsequent


transportation of such individual.


E. Sheriffs and peace officers shall be entitled to


reimbursement from the Department of Mental Health and Substance


Abuse Services for transportation services associated with minors or


adults requiring initial assessment, emergency detention, protective


custody, and inpatient services.


F. Any transportation provided by a sheriff or deputy sheriff


or a peace officer on behalf of any county, city, town, or


municipality of this state, to or from any facility for the purpose


of initial assessment, admission, interfacility transfer, medical


treatment, or court appearance shall be reimbursed in accordance


with the provisions of the State Travel Reimbursement Act.


G. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a law enforcement


agency or the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse

Req. No. 1098 Page 5


Services from entering into a lawful agreement with any other law


enforcement agency to fulfill the requirements established by this


section or from contracting with a third party to provide the


services established by this section, provided the third party meets


minimum standards as determined by the Department.


H. A law enforcement agency shall not be liable for the actions


of a peace officer commissioned by the agency when such officer is


providing services as a third party pursuant to subsection G of this


section outside his or her primary employment as a peace officer.


I. 1. For purposes of transportation completed by the


Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services or an


entity contracted by the Department as required by this section, the


use of mechanical restraints shall not be applied to an individual


being transported unless:


a. the individual being transported physically assaults


or attempts to physically assault the person lawfully


conducting the transportation of the individual


pursuant to the provisions of this section and the


person lawfully conducting the transportation believes


such restraints are necessary for the safety of


himself or herself or the protection of others,


b. the individual being transported attempts or causes


serious physical injury to self and the person


lawfully conducting the transportation believes such

Req. No. 1098 Page 6


restraints are necessary for the safety of the


individual being transported, or


c. the individual being transported has a propensity


toward violence as indicated by past transports,


criminal charges, or mental health history and as


identified in the transport request form, and the


person lawfully conducting the transportation believes


such restraints are necessary for the safety of


himself or herself, for the safety of the individual


being transported, or for the protection of others.


2. The mechanical restraint shall be continued for no longer


than is necessary under the circumstances described in paragraph 1


of this subsection. Every use of a mechanical restraint, the


reasons, and the length of time, shall be made a part of the


clinical record of the consumer under the signature of the


individual responsible for the transportation as required by this


section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1098 DC 1/19/2025 5:43:57 AM









Req. No. 1098 Page 7